Washington statutes.
RCW 43.58.090

Oregon-Washington Columbia River boundary compact—Repeal of RCW 43.58.010 through 43.58.040, when.

Chapter 27, Laws of 1937, as amended by chapter 6, Laws of 1955 extraordinary session and chapter 43.58 RCW [RCW 43.58.010 through 43.58.040] each shall be repealed when the compact set forth in RCW 43.58.060 has been ratified by the state of Oregon and approved by the Congress of the United States.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.58.090. Prior: 1957 c 90 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: See note following RCW 43.58.050.